Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-406] Administrative procedures.
(a) An administrative penalty may be imposed upon a judgment by a court of
competent jurisdiction or upon an order by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner shall hold a hearing in
accordance with chapter 91, prior to imposing any administrative remedy. [L
2009, c 149, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next